Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 2 Trusts

53-12-190.
Automatic amendment of governing instrument of private foundation trust, charitable trust, or split-interest trust.

Notwithstanding any provision therein to the contrary and except as provided in Code Section 53-12-192, the governing trust instrument of any trust which is a private foundation, a charitable trust, as defined in Section 4947(a)(1) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, or a split-interest trust, as defined in Section 4947(a)(2) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, shall be amended automatically as of the later of the inception of the trust or January 1, 1972, to include provisions which prohibit the trustees of the trust from:

Engaging in any act of self-dealing, as defined in Section 4941(d) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4941 of the federal Internal Revenue Code;

Retaining any excess business holdings, as defined in Section 4943(c) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4943 of the federal Internal Revenue Code;

Making any investments which would jeopardize the carrying out of any of the exempt purposes of the trust, within the meaning of Section 4944 of the federal Internal Revenue Code, so as to give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4944 of the federal Internal Revenue Code; and

Making any taxable expenditures, as defined in Section 4945(d) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4945 of the federal Internal Revenue Code;

provided, however, that in the case of a split-interest trust, as defined in Section 4947(a)(2) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, paragraphs (1) through (4) of this Code section shall apply only to the extent required by Section 4947 of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-190

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142.

53-12-191.
Automatic amendment of governing instrument of private foundation trust or charitable trust as to distribution of trust funds.

Notwithstanding any provision therein to the contrary and except as provided in Code Section 53-12-192, the governing trust instrument of any trust which is a private foundation or which is a charitable trust, as defined in Section 4947(a)(1) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, shall be amended automatically as of the later of the inception of the trust or January 1, 1972, to include a provision which requires the trustees to distribute, for the purposes specified in the governing trust instrument, for each taxable year, amounts at least sufficient to avoid any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4942 of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-191

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-192.
Amendment of governing instrument of private foundation trust, charitable trust, or split-interest trust to exclude application of Code Section 53-12-190 or 53-12-191.

The trustees of any trust which is a private foundation, a charitable trust, as defined in Section 4947(a)(1) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, or a split-interest trust, as defined in Section 4947(a)(2) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, may, without judicial proceedings, amend the governing trust instrument of the trust expressly to exclude the application of Code Section 53-12-190 or 53-12-191, or both, by executing a written amendment to the trust and filing a duplicate original of the amendment with the Attorney General of this state, whereupon the Code section or Code sections, as the case may be, shall not apply to the trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-192

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-193.
Election of trustees of private foundation or charitable trust to distribute such trust principal as will enable trust to avoid tax liability; filing of written election with Attorney General; form of distribution; revocation of election.

With respect to any trust which is a private foundation or a charitable trust, as defined in Section 4947(a)(1) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, the governing trust instrument of which permits distributions to the extent of the net income of the trust each year but does not permit distributions from trust principal, the trustees of the trust may elect, without judicial proceedings and notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in the governing trust instrument of the trust, to distribute in any year, for the purposes specified in the governing trust instrument, that amount from the principal of the trust which, when added to the income of the trust available for distribution during such year, will enable the trust to avoid any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4942 of the federal Internal Revenue Code by filing a written election, which may be a continuing one, with the Attorney General of this state to have this Code section and Code Section 53-12-183 apply to the trust. A distribution from trust principal pursuant to the election shall only be in the form of cash or securities which are either listed or admitted to unlisted trading privileges upon any stock exchange or are quoted regularly in any newspaper having a general circulation in this state.

Any election made under subsection (a) of this Code section may be revoked at any time by filing written notice of revocation with the Attorney General of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-193

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-194.
Effect of Code Sections 53-12-190 through 53-12-193 as to forfeiture or reversion of trust property or failure of trust.

Nothing contained in Code Sections 53-12-190 through 53-12-193 shall cause or be construed to cause a forfeiture or reversion of any of the property of a trust which is subject to such Code sections or to make the purposes of such trust impossible of accomplishment.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-194

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-195.
Effect of Code Sections 53-12-190 through 53-12-193 on powers of courts and Attorney General.

Nothing in Code Sections 53-12-190 through 53-12-193 shall impair the rights and powers of the courts or the Attorney General of this state with respect to any trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-195

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.